Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,113
Sale, trade, use, or consumption of beef or veal; requirements; violation; penalty.

(1)(a) Inside of the brand inspection area, no person shall sell or trade or offer for sale or trade the carcass of a beef or veal, or any portion thereof, including the hide of such carcass, unless a certificate of inspection is secured from a brand inspector. Such person shall exhibit the certificate of inspection upon the demand of any person.

(b) Outside of the brand inspection area, no person shall sell or offer for sale, except as a butcher bonded under section 54-1,114, the carcass of a beef or veal, or any portion thereof, without first exhibiting the intact hide of the same and exposing the brand upon the hide, if any, to the purchaser. A person selling or offering for sale any such carcass of beef or veal shall preserve the hide of the same for a period of fifteen days unless a certificate of inspection is secured from a brand inspector, and such person shall exhibit the certificate of inspection upon the demand of any person.

(2) No person shall kill for his, her, or its own use and consumption any cattle for beef or veal without preserving the hide of such animal intact with a complete unskinned tail attached thereto for a period of not less than fifteen days unless a certificate of inspection is secured from a brand inspector, and such hide shall be presented for inspection upon demand of any person.

(3) A violation of this section is an infraction. A peace officer shall have the authority to write a citation, which shall be waivable, to offenders in violation of this section. A fine under this section shall not exceed two hundred dollars per head for each offense. Violations shall be charged in the county in which the offense occurred.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 44;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 25.
August 28, 2021